Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6861XC (3) 91 jm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 423A.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0l. âTourism developmentâ means the creation 3 or expansion of physical attractions, facilities, or events 4 that are available and open to the public, improving the appeal 5 of destinations to tourists, and enhancing tourist experiences 6 that are primarily promoted to or used by tourists. 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00l. âTourism promotionâ means planning, 8 conducting, or participating in programs of information, 9 publicity, and advertising that are designed to attract 10 tourists and foster economic activity through tourism. 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . 000l. âTouristâ means a person who travels 12 more than fifty miles to a destination for business or leisure. 13 Sec. 2. Section 423A.7, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 3. Moneys received by the city or county from this fund 16 shall be credited to the general fund of the city or county , 17 subject to the provisions of subsection 4 . 18 Sec. 3. Section 423A.7, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 19 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 20 lieu thereof the following: 21 a. (1) The governing authority of each city or county 22 that levies the tax shall spend at least fifty percent of the 23 revenues on tourism development and tourism promotion in the 24 city, county, or surrounding areas, as applicable. 25 (2) Beginning with the annual report required to be filed 26 by December 1, 2027, under section 331.403 or 384.22, as 27 applicable, and for each annual report thereafter, the annual 28 report shall contain a detailed accounting and explanation of 29 the use of moneys for tourism development and tourism promotion 30 pursuant to this paragraph. 31